Colorado, session 2026A, HB1122.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 10-16-104, add (31)
as follows:
10-16-104. Mandatory coverage provisions - applicability -
rules - definitions.
(31) Hormone replacement therapy - definition - rules.
(a) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (31), UNLESS THE CONTEXT
OTHERWISE REQUIRES, "HORMONE REPLACEMENT THERAPY":
(I) MEANS A MEDICAL TREATMENT THAT REPLACES A HORMONE
THAT AN INDIVIDUAL'S BODY IS NO LONGER MAKING OR NO LONGER
MAKING ENOUGH OF, AS DETERMINED BY A PHYSICIAN LICENSED
PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 240 OF TITLE 12; AND
(II) MAY INCLUDE PRESCRIBING A CREAM, AN ORAL MEDICATION,
A PELLET MEDICATION, A VAGINAL DEVICE, OR ANOTHER METHOD
APPROVED BY THE FDA.
(b) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (31)(e) OF THIS SECTION,
ALL HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS MUST PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR HORMONE
REPLACEMENT THERAPY FOR A WOMAN WHO IS EXPERIENCING MENOPAUSE
OR PERIMENOPAUSE AS A RESULT OF NATURAL AGING OR ANY OTHER
CAUSE, TO BE ADMINISTERED IN THE METHOD, DOSE, AND FREQUENCY
PRESCRIBED BY A PHYSICIAN LICENSED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 240 OF
TITLE 12.
-2- HB26-1122

(c) A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN MUST NOT:
(I) DENY OR LIMIT HORMONE REPLACEMENT THERAPY THAT IS
PRESCRIBED IN ACCORDANCE WITH GENERALLY ACCEPTED STANDARDS OF
CARE FOR THE PRESCRIPTION OF HORMONE REPLACEMENT THERAPY; OR
(II) REQUIRE PRIOR AUTHORIZATION FOR HORMONE REPLACEMENT
THERAPY.
(d) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ADOPT RULES CONSISTENT WITH
AND AS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THIS SUBSECTION (31).
(e) (I) ALL LARGE EMPLOYER HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS ISSUED OR
RENEWED IN THIS STATE ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, SHALL PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR HORMONE REPLACEMENT THERAPY PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (31).
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (31)(e)(III) OF THIS
SECTION, AND TO THE EXTENT THAT SUCH COVERAGE IS NOT IN ADDITION
TO BENEFITS PROVIDED PURSUANT TO THE STATE BENCHMARK PLAN
REQUIRED PURSUANT TO 45 CFR 156.111, ALL INDIVIDUAL AND SMALL
GROUP HEALTH BENEFIT PLANS ISSUED OR RENEWED IN THIS STATE ON OR
AFTER JANUARY 1, 2028, SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR HORMONE
REPLACEMENT THERAPY PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (31).
(III) SUBSECTION (31)(e)(II) OF THIS SECTION IS INOPERATIVE, AND
THE STATE SHALL NOT ASSUME AN OBLIGATION FOR THE COVERAGE
REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (31)(e)(II) OF THIS SECTION, IF:
(A) THE DIVISION DETERMINES THAT THE COVERAGE SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (31)(e)(II) OF THIS SECTION REQUIRES STATE DEFRAYAL OF
THE COST OF COVERAGE PURSUANT TO A PROVISION OF THE FEDERAL ACT,
INCLUDING 42 U.S.C. SEC. 18031 (d)(3)(B) OR A SUCCESSOR PROVISION
AND THE IMPLEMENTING REGULATIONS; OR
-3- HB26-1122

(B) THE STATE IS OTHERWISE REQUIRED TO DEFRAY THE COST OF
COVERAGE REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (31)(e)(II) OF THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25.5-5-332.5 as
follows:
25.5-5-332.5. Hormone replacement therapy - federal
authorization - definition.
(1) SUBJECT TO FEDERAL AUTHORIZATION AND FEDERAL
FINANCIAL PARTICIPATION, ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2027, THE MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM SHALL INCLUDE HORMONE REPLACEMENT THERAPY
FOR A WOMAN WHO IS EXPERIENCING MENOPAUSE OR PERIMENOPAUSE AS
A RESULT OF NATURAL AGING OR ANY OTHER CAUSE, TO BE ADMINISTERED
IN THE METHOD, DOSE, AND FREQUENCY PRESCRIBED BY A PHYSICIAN
LICENSED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 240 OF TITLE 12.
(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "HORMONE REPLACEMENT THERAPY" HAS THE MEANING SET
FORTH IN SECTION 10-16-104 (31)(a).
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- HB26-1122